Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-255
Facilities, programs, and services for elderly persons; authorized.

A city of the first class may plan, initiate, operate, maintain, administer funding for, and evaluate facilities, programs, and services designed to meet the needs of elderly persons. Such city may contract with state agencies, political subdivisions, and private nonprofit agencies to exercise and carry out such powers.

Laws 1991, LB 810, § 1.